Massachusetts, session 194th, H1258.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 32A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 17O, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 17P. Any coverage offered by the commission to an active or retired employee of
the commonwealth insured under the group insurance commission shall provide coverage for:
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to
the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary
dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss
in enrollees.
(b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck
cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton
therapy, and radiation therapy.
of 10

(c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling
and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride
treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the
risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck
cancer
treatment.
(d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer
including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy,
and radiation therapy
(e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and
rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.
(f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants,
rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function
related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and
to
approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head
and neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects
resulting from the treatment.
(g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications,
restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting
from head and neck cancer or its treatment.
of 10

SECTION 2. Chapter 118E of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 10J, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 10K. The division shall provide coverage for:
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to
the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary
dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss
in enrollees.
(b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck
cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton
therapy, and radiation therapy.
(c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling
and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride
treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the
risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck
cancer treatment.
(d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer
including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy,
and radiation therapy.
(e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and
rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.
of 10

(f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants,
rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function
related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and
to
approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head
and neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects
resulting from the treatment.
(g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications,
restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting
from head and neck cancer or its treatment.
SECTION 3. Chapter 175 of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 47II, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 47JJ. A policy, contract, agreement, plan or certificate of insurance issued,
delivered or renewed within the commonwealth that provides medical expense coverage shall
provide coverage for:
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to
the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary
dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss
in enrollees.
of 10

(b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck
cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton
therapy, and radiation therapy.
(c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling
and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride
treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the
risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck
cancer treatment.
(d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer
including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy,
and radiation therapy.
(e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and
rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.
(f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants,
rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function
related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and
to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and
neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting
from the treatment.
(g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications,
restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting
from head and neck cancer or its treatment.
of 10

SECTION 4. Chapter 176A of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
section 8KK, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
Section 8LL. A contract between a subscriber and the corporation under an individual or
group hospital service plan that is delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall
provide coverage for:
(a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to
100 the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary
101 dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss
102 in enrollees.
103 (b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck
104 cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton
105 therapy, and radiation therapy.
106 (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling
107 and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride
108 treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the
109 risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck
110 cancer treatment.
111 (d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer
112 including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy,
113 and radiation therapy.
of 10

114 (e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and
115 rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.
116 (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants,
117 rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function
118 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and
119 to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and
120 neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting
121 from the treatment.
122 (g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications,
123 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting
124 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.
125 SECTION 5. Chapter 176B of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
126 section 4KK, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
127 Section 4LL. A subscription certificate under an individual or group medical service
128 agreement delivered, issued or renewed within the commonwealth shall provide coverage for:
129 (a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to
130 the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary
131 dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss
132 in enrollees.
of 10

133 (b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck
134 cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton
135 therapy, and radiation therapy.
136 (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling
137 and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride
138 treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the
139 risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck
140 cancer treatment.
141 (d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer
142 including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy,
143 and radiation therapy.
144 (e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and
145 rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.
146 (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants,
147 rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function
148 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and
149 to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and
150 neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting
151 from the treatment.
152 (g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications,
153 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting
154 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.
of 10

155 SECTION 6. Chapter 176G of the General Laws is hereby amended by inserting after
156 section 4CC, as inserted by chapter 233 of the acts 2016, the following section:-
157 Section 4DD. An individual or group health maintenance contract shall provide coverage
158 for:
159 (a) necessary pre-cancer dental care, including preventative and restorative treatment to
160 the hard and soft tissues of the oral cavity, fluoride treatments and trays, and medically necessary
161 dental procedures, to reduce or eliminate the risk of infection or to treat tooth decay or tooth loss
162 in enrollees.
163 (b) dental care that is required prior to the commencement of treatment for head and neck
164 cancer including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton
165 therapy, and radiation therapy.
166 (c) post cancer necessary dental care, including preventative dental phophylaxis’, scaling
167 and root planing, quarterly cleanings, bi-annual assessments by a periodontist, fluoride
168 treatments including trays, and medically necessary dental procedures to reduce or eliminate the
169 risk of infection; or to treat tooth loss or decay directly or indirectly caused by head and neck
170 cancer treatment.
171 (d) dental procedures required as a result of treatments for head and neck cancer
172 including, but not limited to, chemotherapy, immunotherapy, biological therapy, proton therapy,
173 and radiation therapy.
174 (e) laboratory assessments, medications, treatments, evaluations, examinations, and
175 rehabilitation necessary for head and neck cancer treatment and the restoration of function.
of 10

176 (f) patient education, medical devices, prostheses, obturators, dental implants,
177 rehabilitative services necessary to restore, maintain, or improve, the whole or partial function
178 related to eating, breathing, voice, speech, quality of life, social functioning and swallowing; and
179 to approximate the normal appearance of any abnormal structures that is affected by a head and
180 neck cancer diagnosis and/or the treatment of head and neck cancer, or the side effects resulting
181 from the treatment.
182 (g) restorative and rehabilitative care including but not limited to: medications,
183 restoration procedures, and other medical interventions required to address impairments resulting
184 from head and neck cancer or its treatment.
of 10